Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-142.07
Minitruck; application for certificate
of title; contents of certificate.

If a minitruck does not have a manufacturer's vehicle identification
number, the owner of the minitruck may apply for a certificate of title by
presenting (1)(a) a manufacturer's statement of origin for the minitruck or
(b)(i) a bill of sale or a manufacturer's or importer's certificate for a
minitruck purchased before January 1, 2011, or a manufacturer's or importer's
certificate for a minitruck purchased on or after January 1, 2011, and (ii)
an affidavit by the owner affirming ownership for the minitruck, (2) a statement
that an inspection has been conducted on the minitruck, and (3) a vehicle
identification number as described in section 60-148. The certificate of title
shall indicate the make and model year of the minitruck. If the model year
cannot be determined, the model year of the minitruck shall be the year application
for title was made.

Laws 2010, LB650, § 10.